Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1310
Judgment by confession; contents.

The debt or cause of action shall be briefly stated in the judgment, or in a writing to be filed as pleadings in other actions.

R.S.1867, Code § 434, p. 466;

R.S.1913, § 8003;

C.S.1922, § 8944;

C.S.1929, § 20-1310;

R.S.1943, § 25-1310.

The provisions of this section are applicable to only civil proceedings. Dunham v. O'Grady, 137 Neb. 649, 290 N.W. 723 (1940).